Massachusetts, session 194th, H4054.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after section 2JJJJJJ, the
following section:-
Section 2KKKKKK. (a) For the purposes of section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Department”, the Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
“Fair share funds”, revenues generated under the fair share amendment designated for
education and transportation.
“Frequent bus service”, fixed-route bus operations, including routes that operate a
minimum of 15-minute frequency between the hours of 7AM to 7 PM, Monday through Sunday.
of 4

“Microtransit”, technology-driven, demand-responsive shared transportation services
with flexible routes and schedules.
“Regional Transit Authorities”, public transportation agencies operating outside the
Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority service area.
“Secretary”, the secretary of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
(b) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate
fund known as the Microtransit Fund, hereinafter referred to as the fund. The purpose of the fund
shall be to: (i) establish a dedicated funding stream for microtransit projects statewide; (ii)
promote regional equity in transit services; (iii) reduce greenhouse gas emissions through
sustainable transit solutions; and (iv) support and expand existing microtransit operations
without disrupting current programs. The fund shall be administered by the secretary.
(c) The fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money
authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund;
(ii) interest earned on money in the fund; (iii) contributions from private sector entities,
including technology firms, foundations and other organizations; (iv) federal grants and other
gifts, grants and donations for the establishment and support of microtransit projects; and (v) a
minimum of 3 per cent of annual fair share funds to support microtransit projects. Amounts
credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation and any money remaining in the
fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund.
of 4

(d) The secretary shall make expenditures from the fund including, but not limited to, the
following purposes: (i) creating a dedicated funding stream for microtransit services, addressing
transportation inequities in rural and underserved communities across the commonwealth; (ii)
prioritizing and improving first-mile/last-mile connectivity in underserved communities
in the commonwealth; (iii) partnering with other microtransit programs already operating in the
commonwealth, such as the south county connector, Quaboag connector and Franklin county’s
access program, to provide reliable access to essential services for residents in rural areas; (iv)
promoting the adoption of electric and hybrid vehicle fleets to reduce emissions; and (v)
providing resources for driver recruitment, training and retention to address operational
challenges.
(e) The secretary shall make expenditures from the fund to rural or low-density arenas in
the commonwealth that do not have access to rapid transit or frequent bus service. Rural or low-
density areas shall be municipalities located outside of urbanized areas as defined by the Federal
Transit Administration’s urbanized area formula grants pursuant to 49 U.S.C. 5307.
(f) Up to 5 per cent of the fund may be allocated for public awareness campaigns to
educate residents of the commonwealth on accessing and benefiting from microtransit services.
(g) All funded projects shall align with the commonwealth’s 2050 decarbonization
roadmap to: (i) promote equity, sustainability and cost-effective transit solutions; and (ii) include
measures to reduce greenhouse gas emissions with clear benchmarks and transparency.
(h) The department shall: (i) develop application guidelines and award funds within 90
days of the fund’s effective date; (ii) monitor benchmarks, including: (A) a 30 per cent increase
in transit access in underserved areas within 5 years; (B) a cost per revenue hour of below $60,
of 4

inflation-adjusted; (C) an annual average vehicle ride-share rate of at least 15 per cent; and (D)
25 per cent adoption of electric or hybrid vehicles; (iii) collect annual project reports and equity
impact assessments from fund recipients to demonstrate progress in improving access for
underserved populations; and (iv) publish annual reports and conduct independent audits to
ensure transparency.
(i) The department shall annually, not later than December 31, report on the activity of
the fund to the: (i) chairs of the joint committee on transportation; (ii) the chairs of the house and
senate committees on ways and means; and (iii) the clerks of the house of representatives and
senate.
of 4